Massachusetts, session 194th, S2326.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 142K of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following
words:- Notwithstanding the adoption of the California emissions standards under this section, a
vehicle used for the maintenance or repair of public and utility infrastructure including but not
limited to electricity, water, gas, telecommunications, and sewage systems shall be exempt from
this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1